Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-4029.01
Notice of hearing; manner given; contents; notice to neighborhood association.

(1) At least ten days prior to the date of any hearing under sections 19-4026, 19-4029, 19-4029.02, and 19-4029.03, notice of such hearing shall be given by:

(a) One publication of the notice of hearing in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city;

(b) Mailing a copy of the notice of hearing to each owner of taxable property in the proposed, modified, or expanded business improvement district as shown on the latest tax rolls of the county treasurer for such county;

(c) Providing a copy of the notice of hearing to any neighborhood association registered pursuant to subsection (2) of this section in the manner requested by such neighborhood association; and

(d) If an occupation tax is to be imposed, mailing a copy of the notice of hearing to each user of space in the proposed, modified, or expanded business improvement district.

(2) The notice required by subdivision (1)(c) of this section shall be provided to any neighborhood association which is registered pursuant to this subsection and whose area of representation is located, in whole or in part, within a one-mile radius of the existing or proposed, modified, or expanded boundaries of the business improvement district. Each neighborhood association desiring to receive such notice shall register with the city the area of representation of such association and provide the name of and contact information for the individual designated to receive notice on behalf of such association and the requested manner of service, whether by email or first-class or certified mail. The registration shall be in accordance with any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the city.

(3) Any notice of hearing for any hearing required by sections 19-4026 and 19-4029 shall contain the following information:

(a) A description of the boundaries of the proposed business improvement district;

(b) The time and place of a hearing to be held by the city council to consider establishment of the business improvement district;

(c) The proposed public facilities and improvements to be made or maintained within any business improvement district; and

(d) The proposed or estimated costs for improvements and facilities within the proposed business improvement district and the method by which the revenue shall be raised. If a special assessment is proposed, the notice shall also state the proposed method of assessment.

(4) Any notice of hearing for any hearing required by sections 19-4029.02 and 19-4029.03 shall contain the following information:

(a) A description of the boundaries of the area to be added to or removed from the existing business improvement district and a description of the new boundaries of the modified business improvement district;

(b) The time and place of a hearing to be held by the city council to consider establishment of the modified business improvement district;

(c) The new public facilities and improvements, if any, to be made or maintained within any business improvement district; and

(d) The proposed or estimated costs for new and existing improvements and facilities within the proposed, modified, or expanded business improvement district and the method by which the revenue shall be raised. If a special assessment is proposed, the notice shall also state the proposed method of assessment.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 11;

Laws 1983, LB 22, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 19-4025;

Laws 2015, LB168, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB700, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 220;

Laws 2019, LB196, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB68, § 3.
November 14, 2020